apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="/хто__prn">
      <e><p><l>хто</l><r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>каго</l><r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>каму</l><r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>хто</l><r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кім</l><r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кім</l><r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="як/і__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/і"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ога"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/і"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ога"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="гэт/ы__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="BASE__гэт/ы"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="т/ой__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ой<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="BASE__т/ой"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="м/ой__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ой<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__м/ой"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="наш__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__наш"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ягон/ы__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ы"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/ага"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="у/весь__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>весь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="BASE__у/весь"/></e>
    </pardef>





    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="як/і__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/і"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ога"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="гэт/ы__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="BASE__гэт/ы"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="т/ой__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ой<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="BASE__т/ой"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="м/ой__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ой<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__м/ой"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="наш__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__наш"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ягон/ы__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ы"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/ага"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="у/весь__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r>весь<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="BASE__у/весь"/></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="ад/зін__num">
      <e><p><l>зін</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>наго</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>наму</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ін</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>наго</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ным</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ным</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>на</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ной</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ной</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ну</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ной</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ной</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>но</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нага</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>наму</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>но</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ным</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ным</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ны</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ных</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ным</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ны</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ных</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нымі</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ных</l><r>зін<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="д/ва__num">
      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вум</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вума</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вум</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вума</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>зве</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюх</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюм</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зве</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюх</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюма</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюх</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="хто"><i></i><par n="/хто__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="гэты"><i>гэт</i><par n="гэт/ы__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="той"><i>т</i><par n="т/ой__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="мой"><i>м</i><par n="м/ой__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="твой"><i>тв</i><par n="м/ой__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="свой"><i>св</i><par n="м/ой__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ягоны"><i>ягон</i><par n="ягон/ы__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ейны"><i>ейн</i><par n="ягон/ы__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="наш"><i>наш</i><par n="наш__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ваш"><i>ваш</i><par n="наш__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="іхны"><i>іхн</i><par n="ягон/ы__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="які"><i>як</i><par n="як/і__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="увесь"><i>у</i><par n="у/весь__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="які"><i>як</i><par n="як/і__det"/></e>
    <e lm="гэты"><i>гэт</i><par n="гэт/ы__det"/></e>
    <e lm="той"><i>т</i><par n="т/ой__det"/></e>
    <e lm="мой"><i>м</i><par n="м/ой__det"/></e>
    <e lm="твой"><i>тв</i><par n="м/ой__det"/></e>
    <e lm="свой"><i>св</i><par n="м/ой__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ягоны"><i>ягон</i><par n="ягон/ы__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ейны"><i>ейн</i><par n="ягон/ы__det"/></e>
    <e lm="наш"><i>наш</i><par n="наш__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ваш"><i>ваш</i><par n="наш__det"/></e>
    <e lm="іхны"><i>іхн</i><par n="ягон/ы__det"/></e>
    <e lm="увесь"><i>у</i><par n="у/весь__det"/></e>
    <e lm="адзін"><i>ад</i><par n="ад/зін__num"/></e>
    <e lm="два"><i>д</i><par n="д/ва__num"/></e>
